epay/epayservices/src/main/resources/com/otextpdf/text/pdf/hyphenation/hyph/mn.xml
	<patterns>
		1ба
		1бе
		1бё
		1би
		1бо
		1бө
		1бу
		1бү
		1бы
		1бь2ю
		1бэ
		1бю
		1бя
		1ва
		1ве
		1вё
		1ви
		1во
		1вө
		1ву
		1вү
		1вы
		1вь2ю
		1вэ
		1вю
		1вя
		1га
		1ге
		1гё
		1ги
		1го
		1гө
		1гу
		1гү
		1гы
		1гь2ю
		1гэ
		1гю
		1гя
		1да
		1де
		1дё
		1ди
		1до
		1дө
		1ду
		1дү
		1ды
		1дь2ю
		1дэ
		1дю
		1дя
		1жа
		1же
		1жё
		1жи
		1жо
		1жө
		1жу
		1жү
		1жэ
		1жю
		1жя
		1за
		1зе
		1зё
		1зи
		1зо
		1зө
		1зу
		1зү
		1зы
		1зь2ю
		1зэ
		1зю
		1зя
		1ка
		1ке
		1кё
		1ки
		1ко
		1ку
		1кү
		1кэ
		1кю
		1кя
		1ла
		1ле
		1лё
		1ли
		1ло
		1лө
		1лу
		1лү
		1лы
		1лэ
		1лю
		1ля
		1ма
		1ме
		1мё
		1ми
		1мо
		1мө
		1му
		1мү
		1мы
		1мэ
		1мю
		1мя
		1на
		1не
		1нё
		1ни
		1но
		1нө
		1ну
		1нү
		1ны
		1нь2ю
		1нэ
		1ню
		1ня
		1па
		1пе
		1пё
		1пи
		1по
		1пө
		1пу
		1пү
		1пы
		1пь2ю
		1пэ
		1пю
		1пя
		1ра
		1ре
		1рё
		1ри
		1ро
		1рө
		1ру
		1рү
		1ры
		1рэ
		1рю
		1ря
		1са
		1се
		1сё
		1си
		1со
		1сө
		1су
		1сү
		1сы
		1сэ
		1сю
		1ся
		1та
		1те
		1тё
		1ти
		1то
		1тө
		1ту
		1тү
		1ты
		1ть2ю
		1тэ
		1тю
		1тя
		1фа
		1фе
		1фё
		1фи
		1фо
		1фу
		1фы
		1фэ
		1фю
		1фя
		1ха
		1хе
		1хё
		1хи
		1хо
		1хө
		1ху
		1хү
		1хы
		1хэ
		1хю
		1хя
		1ца
		1це
		1цё
		1ци
		1цо
		1цө
		1цу
		1цү
		1цы
		1цэ
		1цю
		1ця
		1ча
		1че
		1чё
		1чи
		1чо
		1чө
		1чу
		1чү
		1чэ
		1чю
		1чя
		1ша
		1ше
		1шё
		1ши
		1шо
		1шө
		1шу
		1шү
		1шэ
		1шю
		1шя
		1ща
		1ще
		1щи
		1щу
		2а1я
		2аа
		2б3ю4у
		2б3ю4ү
		2в3ю4у
		2в3ю4ү
		2г3ю4у
		2г3ю4ү
		2д3ю4у
		2д3ю4ү
		2ж3ю4у
		2ж3ю4ү
		2з3ю4у
		2з3ю4ү
		2и1е
		2й1е
		2й1ё
		2й1ю
		2й1я
		2л3ю4у
		2л3ю4ү
		2м3ю4у
		2м3ю4ү
		2н3ю4у
		2н3ю4ү
		2о1е
		2о1ё
		2о1я
		2оо
		2ө1е
		2өө
		2п3ю4у
		2п3ю4ү
		2р3ю4у
		2р3ю4ү
		2с3ю4у
		2с3ю4ү
		2т3ю4у
		2т3ю4ү
		2у1я
		2у3ю
		2уу
		2үү
		2х3ю4у
		2х3ю4ү
		2ц3ю4у
		2ц3ю4ү
		2ч3ю4у
		2ч3ю4ү
		2ш3ю4у
		2ш3ю4ү
		2ъ3е
		2ъ3ё
		2ъ3ю
		2ъ3я
		2ь3е
		2ь3ё
		2ь3я
		2э3е
		2ээ
		2ю3а
		2ю3и
		2ю3о
		.авто3а4г
		.авто3а4д
		.авто3а4к
		.авто3а4л
		.авто3а4н
		.авто3а4с
		.авто3б4л
		.авто3б4р
		.авто3в4в
		.авто3в4л
		.авто3г4р
		.авто3д4р
		.авто3и4м
		.авто3и4н
		.авто3и4о
		.авто3к4л
		.авто3к4р
		.авто3о4б
		.авто3о4к
		.авто3о4п
		.авто3о4т
		.авто3п4р
		.авто3с4к
		.авто3с4л
		.авто3с4м
		.авто3с4п
		.авто3с4т
		.авто3с4ц
		.авто3т4р
		.авто3ф4л
		.авто3ф4р
		.авто3х4р
		.авто3х4т
		.авто3ц4в
		.авто3э4к
		.авто3э4л
		.авто3э4м
		.авто3э4п
		.анти3а4в
		.анти3а4д
		.анти3а4л
		.анти3а4н
		.анти3а4п
		.анти3а4р
		.анти3а4с
		.анти3а4т
		.анти3а4у
		.анти3б4л
		.анти3г4л
		.анти3г4р
		.анти3д4р
		.анти3и4д
		.анти3и4з
		.анти3и4м
		.анти3и4н
		.анти3к4в
		.анти3к4л
		.анти3о4б
		.анти3о4з
		.анти3о4к
		.анти3п4л
		.анти3п4н
		.анти3п4р
		.анти3п4с
		.анти3с4в
		.анти3с4к
		.анти3с4т
		.анти3с4ц
		.анти3т4р
		.анти3у4з
		.анти3у4р
		.анти3у4т
		.анти3ф4л
		.анти3ф4р
		.анти3х4л
		.анти3х4р
		.анти3э4м
		.анти3э4н
		.анти3э4р
		.астро3б4л
		.астро3г4л
		.астро3г4р
		.астро3и4н
		.астро3о4р
		.астро3с4п
		.астро3ш4т
		.аэро3д4р
		.аэро3к4л
		.аэро3п4л
		.аэро3с4т
		.аэро3ф4л
		.би3а4к
		.би3а4л
		.би3а4ф
		.би3к4в
		.би3к4р
		.би3о4р
		.би3п4р
		.би3э4к
		.био3а4к
		.био3а4н
		.био3а4п
		.био3а4с
		.био3б4л
		.био3г4р
		.био3и4н
		.био3к4л
		.био3к4р
		.био3о4р
		.био3п4л
		.био3п4р
		.био3с4к
		.био3с4п
		.био3с4т
		.био3с4ф
		.био3х4р
		.био3э4к
		.био3э4л
		.био3э4н
		.био3э4т
		.бь4
		.въ4
		.вь4
		.газо3а4б
		.газо3а4д
		.газо3а4н
		.газо3а4п
		.гео3а4к
		.гео3б4л
		.гео3г4р
		.гео3и4з
		.гео3и4н
		.гео3к4р
		.гео3с4к
		.гео3с4т
		.гео3с4ф
		.гео3т4р
		.гео3ф4л
		.гео3х4р
		.гео3э4к
		.гео3э4л
		.гидро3а4б
		.гидро3а4в
		.гидро3а4г
		.гидро3а4д
		.гидро3а4к
		.гидро3а4л
		.гидро3а4м
		.гидро3а4р
		.гидро3а4э
		.гидро3г4р
		.гидро3и4з
		.гидро3и4н
		.гидро3и4о
		.гидро3к4л
		.гидро3к4р
		.гидро3о4к
		.гидро3п4л
		.гидро3п4н
		.гидро3с4т
		.гидро3с4ф
		.гидро3т4р
		.гидро3у4д
		.гидро3у4з
		.гидро3у4р
		.гидро3х4л
		.гидро3э4к
		.гидро3э4л
		.гидро3э4н
		.гипе2р3а4д
		.гипе2р3а4з
		.гипе2р3а4к
		.гипе2р3а4л
		.гипе2р3а4м
		.гипе2р3а4р
		.гипе2р3а4ц
		.гипе2р3а4э
		.гипе2р3е4а
		.гипе2р3е4м
		.гипе2р3е4р
		.гипе2р3е4с
		.гипе2р3и4з
		.гипе2р3и4м
		.гипе2р3и4н
		.гипе2р3о4в
		.гипе2р3о4к
		.гипе2р3о4с
		.гипер3б4р
		.гипер3г4л
		.гипер3г4р
		.гипер3к4в
		.гипер3к4р
		.гипер3м4н
		.гипер3п4л
		.гипер3п4н
		.гипер3п4р
		.гипер3с4п
		.гипер3с4р
		.гипер3с4с
		.гипер3с4т
		.гипер3т4р
		.гипер3у4р
		.гипер3ф4р
		.гипер3х4л
		.гипер3х4р
		.гипер3э4к
		.гипер3э4л
		.гипер3э4н
		.гипер3э4о
		.гипер3э4с
		.голо3б4л
		.голо3э4д
		.гомо3а4з
		.гомо3а4к
		.гомо3а4т
		.гомо3к4л
		.гомо3п4л
		.гомо3с4п
		.гомо3т4р
		.гомо3ф4т
		.гомо3э4н
		.гомо3э4п
		.гь4
		.ди1а3г4н
		.ди4ст5ри
		.ди4ст5ро
		.диа3д4р
		.диа3к4л
		.диа3к4р
		.диа3с4к
		.диа3с4п
		.диа3с4т
		.диа3т4р
		.диа3ф4р
		.диазо3т4р
		.диазо3э4т
		.диазо3э4ф
		.дина3т4р
		.дь4
		.евро3а4з
		.евро3а4т
		.евро3и4е
		.евро3к4р
		.евро3о4б
		.евро3с4п
		.евро3с4т
		.изо3а4в
		.изо3а4г
		.изо3а4д
		.изо3а4з
		.изо3а4к
		.изо3а4л
		.изо3а4м
		.изо3а4н
		.изо3б4р
		.изо3в4р
		.изо3г4л
		.изо3г4р
		.изо3д4р
		.изо3и4о
		.изо3й4о
		.изо3к4л
		.изо3к4р
		.изо3л4г
		.изо3л4ж
		.изо3о4к
		.изо3п4л
		.изо3п4р
		.изо3с4т
		.изо3т4к
		.изо3т4р
		.изо3х4р
		.изо3ш4л
		.изо3э4в
		.изо3э4д
		.изо3э4й
		.изо3э4л
		.изо3э4н
		.ин3а4кт
		.ин3а4п
		.ин3а4у
		.ин3б4р
		.ин3г4р
		.ин3к4л
		.ин3к4р
		.ин3с4тр
		.инте2р3а4к
		.интер3г4р
		.интер3к4в
		.интер3к4р
		.интер3п4р
		.интер3ф4л
		.кило3а4м
		.кило3г4р
		.кило3э4л
		.кино3а4к
		.кино3а4н
		.кино3а4п
		.кино3а4ф
		.кино3б4л
		.кино3д4р
		.кино3и4с
		.кино3к4л
		.кино3к4р
		.кино3о4п
		.кино3п4л
		.кино3п4р
		.кино3с4к
		.кино3с4ъ
		.кино3ф4л
		.кино3ф4р
		.кино3х4р
		.кино3э4к
		.ко3а4г
		.ко3а4д
		.ко3а4к
		.ко3и4н
		.ко3о4п
		.ко3о4р
		.ко3п4л
		.ко3э4ф
		.кь4
		.ль4
		.макро3а4н
		.макро3а4с
		.макро3б4л
		.макро3б4р
		.макро3г4л
		.макро3г4н
		.макро3г4р
		.макро3и4н
		.макро3и4с
		.макро3к4л
		.макро3к4р
		.макро3о4в
		.макро3о4п
		.макро3о4р
		.макро3п4л
		.макро3п4р
		.макро3с4к
		.макро3с4п
		.макро3с4т
		.макро3с4х
		.макро3т4р
		.макро3ф4л
		.макро3ф4т
		.макро3э4в
		.макро3э4к
		.макро3э4л
		.макро3э4н
		.макро3э4р
		.макро3э4с
		.мега3о4м
		.мега3п4р
		.мега3с4к
		.мега3с4п
		.мега3э4л
		.микро3а4в
		.микро3а4г
		.микро3а4д
		.микро3а4м
		.микро3а4н
		.микро3а4р
		.микро3а4с
		.микро3а4у
		.микро3а4э
		.микро3б4л
		.микро3б4р
		.микро3г4р
		.микро3д4в
		.микро3и4з
		.микро3и4н
		.микро3и4с
		.микро3й4о
		.микро3к4л
		.микро3к4н
		.микро3к4р
		.микро3о4б
		.микро3о4п
		.микро3о4р
		.микро3о4с
		.микро3п4л
		.микро3п4р
		.микро3с4к
		.микро3с4п
		.микро3с4т
		.микро3с4ф
		.микро3с4х
		.микро3т4р
		.микро3ф4л
		.микро3х4р
		.микро3э4в
		.микро3э4л
		.микро3э4м
		.микро3э4н
		.микро3э4р
		.милли3а4м
		.милли3г4р
		.милли3о4м
		.милли3э4к
		.моно3а4в
		.моно3а4з
		.моно3а4л
		.моно3а4м
		.моно3а4н
		.моно3а4р
		.моно3а4т
		.моно3а4ц
		.моно3б4л
		.моно3б4р
		.моно3г4л
		.моно3г4р
		.моно3и4з
		.моно3и4м
		.моно3и4н
		.моно3к4л
		.моно3к4р
		.моно3о4к
		.моно3о4л
		.моно3п4л
		.моно3п4р
		.моно3п4с
		.моно3с4п
		.моно3с4т
		.моно3т4р
		.моно3ф4т
		.моно3х4л
		.моно3х4р
		.моно3э4д
		.моно3э4н
		.моно3э4п
		.моно3э4т
		.моно3э4ф
		.мото3д4р
		.мото3к4р
		.мото3п4л
		.мото3п4р
		.мото3с4п
		.мото3ш4л
		.мь4
		.на3у
		.нано3а4д
		.нано3п4р
		.нео3а4д
		.нео3а4н
		.нео3а4р
		.нео3б4л
		.нео3г4л
		.нео3г4н
		.нео3г4р
		.нео3и4з
		.нео3и4м
		.нео3и4н
		.нео3к4л
		.нео3к4р
		.нео3п4л
		.нео3п4р
		.нео3х4р
		.нео3э4з
		.нео3э4н
		.нео3э4п
		.нео3э4с
		.нь4
		.орто3а4л
		.орто3а4м
		.орто3а4н
		.орто3а4р
		.орто3д4р
		.орто3и4з
		.орто3к4р
		.орто3п4л
		.орто3п4р
		.орто3п4с
		.орто3с4в
		.орто3с4к
		.орто3с4т
		.орто3т4р
		.орто3х4л
		.орто3х4р
		.орто3э4т
		.орто3э4ф
		.пара3а4к
		.пара3а4л
		.пара3а4м
		.пара3а4н
		.пара3а4п
		.пара3а4ц
		.пара3б4л
		.пара3г4н
		.пара3г4р
		.пара3к4л
		.пара3к4р
		.пара3о4к
		.пара3п4л
		.пара3п4с
		.пара3с4п
		.пара3с4ф
		.пара3с4ц
		.пара3т4р
		.пара3х4л
		.пара3х4р
		.пара3э4л
		.пара3э4т
		.паро3п4р
		.поли3а4в
		.поли3а4д
		.поли3а4з
		.поли3а4к
		.поли3а4л
		.поли3а4м
		.поли3а4н
		.поли3а4р
		.поли3а4ц
		.поли3б4р
		.поли3г4л
		.поли3г4р
		.поли3и4з
		.поли3и4м
		.поли3к4л
		.поли3к4р
		.поли3о4к
		.поли3о4л
		.поли3п4л
		.поли3п4н
		.поли3п4р
		.поли3с4п
		.поли3с4т
		.поли3у4р
		.поли3х4л
		.поли3х4р
		.поли3э4д
		.поли3э4к
		.поли3э4л
		.поли3э4н
		.поли3э4т
		.поли3э4ф
		.пре3э4к
		.пре3ю4д
		.про3а4г
		.про3а4к
		.про3а4м
		.про3а4н
		.про3а4у
		.про3г4р
		.про3и4г
		.про3и4з
		.про3и4л
		.про3и4н
		.про3к4л
		.про3с4п
		.про3х4р
		.про3э4к
		.про3э4м
		.про3э4н
		.про3э4р
		.про3э4с
		.прото3х4л
		.прото3х4р
		.прото3э4р
		.проф3г4р
		.пъ4
		.пь4
		.ре3а4б
		.ре3а4г
		.ре3а4д
		.ре3а4к
		.ре3а4с
		.ре3а4ф
		.ре3а4э
		.ре3г4р
		.ре3и4м
		.ре3и4н
		.ре3и4ф
		.ре3к4р
		.ре3п4р
		.ре3т4ра
		.ретро3а4к
		.ретро3а4у
		.ретро3г4р
		.ретро3о4т
		.ретро3ф4л
		.санти3г4р
		.стерео3а4д
		.стерео3а4к
		.стерео3б4л
		.стерео3г4р
		.стерео3и4з
		.стерео3с4к
		.стерео3с4п
		.стерео3т4р
		.стерео3э4л
		.стерео3э4н
		.стерео3э4ф
		.супер3а4г
		.супер3а4д
		.супер3а4к
		.супер3а4н
		.супер3а4р
		.супер3а4э
		.супер3г4р
		.супер3е4с
		.супер3и4з
		.супер3и4к
		.супер3и4м
		.супер3и4н
		.супер3к4л
		.супер3п4р
		.супер3с4к
		.супер3с4п
		.супер3с4т
		.супер3х4р
		.супер3э4в
		.супер3э4к
		.супер3э4ф
		.съ4
		.сь4
		.ть4
		.фь4
		.хризо3и4д
		.хризо3п4р
		.хризо3с4т
		.хь4
		.элек3тро
		.элек3тро3а4в
		.элек3тро3а4г
		.элек3тро3а4к
		.элек3тро3а4н
		.элек3тро3а4э
		.элек3тро3б4л
		.элек3тро3и4з
		.элек3тро3и4с
		.элек3тро3о4б
		.элек3тро3о4в
		.элек3тро3о4г
		.элек3тро3о4д
		.элек3тро3о4к
		.элек3тро3о4п
		.элек3тро3о4с
		.элек3тро3о4т
		.элек3тро3о4ф
		.элек3тро3о4ч
		.элек3тро3с4т
		.элек3тро3т4р
		.элек3тро3э4к
		.элек3тро3э4н
		.элек3тро3э4р
		3авто
		3актив
		3аппа
		3г4рад
		3г4рам
		3г4раф
		3им4пул
		3ин3ст4ру
		3ин3те4р
		3к4ва
		3к4лас
		3к4ри
		3оп3тик
		3п3роек
		3п4ро
		3с4коп
		3с4фе
		3с4хе
		3ск4ла
		3ск4ле
		3ск4ло
		3ск4ля
		3ск4ра
		3ск4ре
		3ск4ри
		3ск4ро
		3ск4ру
		3ск4ры
		3сп4ла
		3ст4ра
		3ст4ре
		3ст4ри
		3ст4ро
		3ст4рук
		3ф4рагм
		3х4лор
		3х4ром
		3ш2таб
		3ш2тат
		3э4к5ви
		3э4ко
		3э4лек4т
		3э4леме
		3э4нерг
		3э4нтро
		3эффе
	</patterns>

</hyphenation-info>
